North Dakota, session 69, SB2345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. STATE EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS. The 2025-27
biennium compensation adjustments for permanent state employees are to equal four percent
per eligible employee for the first year of the biennium and are to equal four percent per eligible
employee for the second year of the biennium. The increases for the first year of the biennium
are to be given beginning with the month of July 2025, to be paid in August 2025, and for the
second year of the biennium are to be given beginning with the month of July 2026, to be paid
in August 2026.
Page No. 1 25.0832.01000